algorithms/persian.sbl
  // --- Noun plurals.
  //     -YAN and -GAN are productive; -AN is guarded by 'protect_lex_an' probe.
  define Noun_Plural as (
    [substring] among (
      '{ye}{alef}{nun}'     ($(len > 5) delete set changed)                 // -YAN
      '{gaf}{alef}{nun}'    ($(len > 5) delete set changed)                 // -GAN
      '{heh}{alef}{ye}{ye}' ($(len > 6) delete set changed)                 // -HAYI
      '{heh}{alef}{ye}'     ($(len > 5) delete set changed)                 // -HAY
      '{alef}{nun}{ye}'     ($(len > 5) delete set changed)                 // -ANI
      '{heh}{alef}'         ($(len > 4) delete set changed)                 // -HA
      '{alef}{nun}'         ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 4) delete set changed ) // -AN (only if not lexical)
      '{ye}{nun}'           ($(len > 4) delete set changed)                 // -IN
      '{alef}{te}'          ($(len > 4) delete set changed)                 // -AT
    )
  )

  // --- Other derivational noun endings (conservative set).
  //     Order: longer patterns before shorter (e.g., -YAT before -Y).
  define Noun_Other as (
    [substring] among (
      '{gaf}{alef}{heh}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed set freeze_pass ) // -GAH
      '{be}{alef}{nun}'   ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -BAN
      '{dal}{alef}{nun}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed set freeze_pass ) // -DAN
      '{gaf}{ye}'         ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -GI (abstract noun)
      '{ye}{te}'          ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -YAT
      '{ye}{ye}'          ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -YY (double Y)
    )
  )

  // --- Composite noun step (OR chain).
  //     Any noun success sets `freeze_pass` so adj/verb do not run this pass.
  define Stem_Noun as (
    ( N_Hash set freeze_pass )
    or ( Noun_Other set freeze_pass )
    or ( Noun_Plural set freeze_pass )
    or ( Noun_Possessive set freeze_pass )
  )

  // --- Adjective: comparative/superlative (HPS).
  define Adjective_Superlative_Comparative as (
    [substring] among (
      '{te}{re}{ye}{nun}' ($(len > 6) delete set changed) // -TARIN
      '{te}{re}'          ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -TAR
    )
  )

  // --- Adjective derivational endings (HPS list + common variants).
  define Adjective_Derivational as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{nun}{heh}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -ANE
      '{mim}{nun}{dal}'   ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -MAND
      '{vav}{alef}{re}'   ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -VAR
      '{nun}{alef}{kaf}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -NAK
      '{gaf}{alef}{re}'   ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -GAR
      '{ye}{nun}'         ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -IN
    )
  )

  // --- Adjective: relative -Y and final -H cleanups.
  define Adjective_Relative as (
    [substring] among (
      '{ye}{ye}'  ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -YY
    )
  )

  // --- Composite adjective step (OR chain).
  define Stem_Adjective as (
    Adjective_Superlative_Comparative or
    Adjective_Derivational or
    Adjective_Relative
  )

  // --- Participle + person/aux clitic tails
  define Participle_Clitic_Tails as (
  [substring] among (
      '{alef}{ye}{dal}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed)
      '{alef}{ye}{mim}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed)
      '{alef}{nun}{dal}' ($(len > 5) delete set changed)
      '{alef}{sin}{te}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed)
      '{alef}{sin}'      ($(len > 4) delete set changed)
      '{alef}{ye}'       ($(len > 4) delete set changed)
      '{ye}{dal}'        ($(len > 4) delete set changed)
      '{ye}{mim}'        ($(len > 4) delete set changed)
      '{mim}'            ($(len > 3) delete set changed)
      '{dal}'            ($(len > 3) delete set changed)
    )
  )

  // --- Verb: person/number endings
  define Verb_Person_Endings as (
    // 1) Specific past-3sg stem fixes for
    [substring] among (
      '{re}{fe}{te}{mim}'                 (<- '{re}{fe}{te}' set changed)
      '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}'                  (<- '{re}{fe}{te}' set changed)
      '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}{mim}'             (<- '{re}{fe}{te}' set changed)
      '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}{dal}'             (<- '{re}{fe}{te}' set changed)
      '{re}{fe}{te}{alef}{nun}{dal}'      (<- '{re}{fe}{te}' set changed)
    )
    or
    // 2) Generic person endings — only if we saw a verb cue this pass
    ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) and
      [substring] among (
        '{alef}{nun}{dal}' ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -AND
        '{ye}{dal}'        ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -ID
        '{ye}{mim}'        ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -IM
        '{alef}{mim}'      ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -AM
        '{dal}'            ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // -D
        '{mim}'            ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // -M
      )
    )
  )

  // --- Verb: mood/tense markers (HPS).
  define Verb_Tense_Mood_Markers as (
    [substring] among (
      '{heh}'       ($(len > 3) delete set changed set saw_inf_or_part) // participle -H
      '{alef}{nun}' ($(len > 4) delete set changed set saw_inf_or_part) // infinitive -N / -AN
    )
  )

  // --- Composite verb step (OR chain).
  define Stem_Verb as (
    Participle_Clitic_Tails or
    V_Hash or
    Verb_Person_Endings or
    Verb_Tense_Mood_Markers
  )
)

// ============================================================================
//  MAIN (HPS pipeline)
//  - 1) Normalize script/spacing.
//  - 2) Strip all leading prefixes (one per call; repeat while changed).
//  - 3) In each pass: try Noun; if Noun changed, `freeze_pass` short-circuits
//       Adjective/Verb for this pass. Otherwise try Adjective, then Verb.
//  Invariants:
//    - After each outer iteration, either the buffer is shorter or unchanged.
//    - 'changed' controls loop termination (no infinite loop).
// ============================================================================
define stem as (
  // 1) Normalize script/spacing
  do Normalize_Characters

  // 2) Anchor start for prefix stripping
  setmark start_mark

  // 3) Peel prefixes (forward, anchored)
  repeat (
    unset changed
    Strip_Prefix_At_Start
    changed
  )

  // 4) Peel suffixes (backward), one layer per pass
  repeat (
    unset changed
    unset saw_inf_or_part
    do Protect_Lexical_AN
    backwards (
      // HPS heuristic order when POS is unknown: Noun → Adjective → Verb
       unset freeze_pass
      ( do Stem_Noun and ( freeze_pass or ( do Stem_Adjective or do Stem_Verb ) ) )
      or
      ( do Stem_Adjective or do Stem_Verb )
    )
    changed
  )
)
